District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

1-309.31

Definitions.

Repealed.

History

June 19, 1976, D.C. Law 1-72, § 2, 23 DCR 574
June 27, 2000, D.C. Law 13-135, § 5, 47 DCR 2741

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-265.
1973 Ed., § 1-171m.